Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1397.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 23, chapter 2, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 23-207, to read: START_STATUTE23-207. Employers; pregnant employees; reasonable accommodation; notice A. An employer that employs fifteen or more employees shall provide a reasonable accommodation for pregnant employees unless that accommodation would impose an undue hardship on the business. The reasonable accommodation may include any of the following: 1. Acquisition or modification of equipment or devices. 2. more frequent break periods or additional restroom, food or water breaks. 3. Assistance with manual labor. 4. A private area for breastfeeding after childbirth. 5. Modification of work schedules or job ASSIGNMENTS. 6. Scheduling flexibility to accommodate prenatal health care visits. B. An employer may not require the employee to use annual, vacation or sick leave if a reasonable accommodation can be made. C. An employer shall conspicuously post notice of the employer's requirement to provide a reasonable accommodation to a pregnant employee and include a copy of that information in the employee handbook. D. An employer shall provide written notice of the requirement to: 1. newly hired employees at the time of hire. 2. Current employees within one hundred eighty days after the effective date of this section. 3. pregnant employees within ten days after the employee informs the employee's employer of the pregnancy. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Short title This act may be cited as the "Pregnant Workers Protection Act".